Louisiana, session 2026, HB749.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3084(A)(14), 3085(3), 3086, 3092(13) and (14), 3093(C)(3) and
(D)(1)(f), 3095(A)(4) and (E)(2), 3100.2(12) and (13), 3100.3(B)(3) and (C)(1)(f), and
3100.5(A)(4) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:3090(E), 3099(I) and (J),
3100.5(G), 3100.8(I) and (J), Chapter 22-C of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 17:3100.21 through 3100.26, and R.S. 17:3129.4(D) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§3084. Louisiana Tuition Trust Authority; rules; compliance with federal
requirements
A. The authority shall, by adoption of rules pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act and in consultation with the advisory council, provide for the
following functions, policies, and requirements of the program and shall ensure
through such rules that all of the following aspects of the program comply with all
applicable provisions of Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code and with any
regulations pertaining to qualified ABLE programs issued pursuant thereto:
* * *
(14) The determination, until the date of the execution of a contract with a
program manager as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, of the rate of interest to
be paid on ABLE accounts of record at the close of a calendar year, provided that
such rate is not a negative rate and is approved by the state treasurer.
* * *
§3085. Louisiana Tuition Trust Authority; powers relative to the administration of
the program
In addition to any other powers conferred by this Chapter, the authority may
do any of the following:
* * *
(3) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments
necessary to the exercise and discharge of the powers and duties of the authority,
including contracts for the administration of ABLE accounts and the investment of
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
account funds in accordance with federal law, this Chapter, and Chapter 22-C of this
Title.
* * *
§3086. ABLE account funds; investment
A. The state treasurer shall invest monies deposited in the ABLE accounts
in the same manner as prescribed by R.S. 17:3091 et seq. for the investment of
monies deposited in START Program accounts. Funds in ABLE accounts shall be
invested in such investment options and subject to the same requirements and
limitations for funds deposited in START Program accounts provided in R.S.
17:3091 et seq., except as otherwise provided in this Chapter.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section or any other provision of
law to the contrary, beginning on the date of the execution of a contract between the
authority and a program manager as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, all ABLE
accounts may be administered, and all funds in such accounts may be invested, by
the program manager.
* * *
§3090. Achieving a Better Life Experience in Louisiana Fund
* * *
E. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section or any other law to the
contrary, beginning on the date of the execution of a contract between the authority
and a program manager as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, all ABLE accounts
may be administered, and all funds in such accounts may be invested, by the program
manager.
* * *
§3092. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
(13) "Variable earnings" means that portion of funds in an education savings
account invested in equities.
(14) "Variable Earnings Transaction Fund" means the subaccount established
by the state treasurer within the Louisiana Education Tuition and Savings Fund to
receive earnings funds as described in R.S. 17:3095(H) to be maintained by the state
treasurer until the date of the execution of a contract between the Louisiana Tuition
Trust Authority and a program manager as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title.
§3093. Louisiana Tuition Trust Authority; creation; powers
* * *
C. In addition to any other powers conferred by this Chapter, the authority
may do any of the following:
* * *
(3) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments
necessary to the exercise and discharge of the powers and duties of the authority,
including contracts for the administration of education savings accounts and the
investment of account funds in accordance with federal law, this Chapter, and
Chapter 22-C of this Title.
* * *
D.(1) The authority shall, by adoption of rules pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act, provide for the following:
* * *
(f) The determination, until the date of the execution of a contract between
the authority and a program manager as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, of the
rate of interest to be paid on education savings accounts of record at the close of a
calendar year, provided that such rate is not a negative rate and is approved by the
state treasurer.
* * *
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
§3095. Education savings accounts; types, use, limitations, and disclosures
A.
* * *
(4) Subject to the limitation imposed by R.S. 17:3098(B), the authority shall
guarantee, until the date of execution of a contract with a program manager as
provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, payment of the redemption value of an
education savings account in which the deposits and interest are invested in fixed
earnings.
* * *
E.
* * *
(2) Prior to the close of the calendar year in which the program is
implemented and each year thereafter on a date specified by the authority, the state
treasurer shall determine and report to the authority, until the date of the execution
of the authority's contract with a program manager, the total earnings and the rate of
return achieved on deposits in the Louisiana Education Tuition and Savings Fund.
Based upon the fund's reported earnings, the authority shall establish, until the date
of the execution of the authority's contract with a program manager, the rate of
interest to be applied to the accumulated principal and interest in education savings
accounts of record, subject to approval by the state treasurer. The authority shall
calculate and credit the appropriate amount of interest earnings to each such account
prior to the close of the calendar year until the date of the execution of the authority's
contract with a program manager.
* * *
§3099. Louisiana Education and Tuition Savings Fund; use
* * *
I. The authority may enter into a contract with a program manager to
administer savings accounts and to invest the funds in such accounts as provided in
Chapter 22-C of this Title.
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
J.(1) Beginning on the date of the execution of a contract between the
authority and a program manager as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, monies
in savings accounts as contained in the Louisiana Tuition and Savings Fund may be
administered and invested by the program manager.
(2) On the date of the execution of a contract between the authority and a
program manager as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, all monies deposited in
savings accounts as contained in this fund shall be transferred to the program
manager, except for the contents of the Savings Enhancement Fund, which shall
continue to be subject to the provisions of R.S. 17:3129.4.
* * *
§3100.2. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(12) "Variable earnings" means that portion of funds in an education savings
account invested in equities.
(13) "Variable Earnings Transaction Fund" means the subaccount established
by the state treasurer within the Tuition and Savings Fund to receive earnings funds
as described in R.S. 17:3100.5(F) to be maintained by the state treasurer until the
date of the execution of a contract between the authority and a program manager as
provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title.
§3100.3. Louisiana Tuition Trust Authority; administration; powers
* * *
B. In addition to any other powers conferred by this Chapter or any other
provision of law, the authority may do any of the following:
* * *
(3) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments
necessary to the exercise and discharge of the powers and duties of the authority,
including contracts for the administration of education savings accounts and
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
investment of account funds in accordance with federal law, this Chapter, and
Chapter 22-C of this Title.
* * *
C.(1) The authority shall, by adoption of rules pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act, provide for the following:
* * *
(f) The Until the date of the execution of a contract with a program manager
as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, the rate of interest to be paid on education
savings accounts of record at the close of a calendar year. Such rate shall not be a
negative rate and shall be approved by the state treasurer.
* * *
§3100.5. Education savings accounts; types, use, limitations, and disclosures
A.
* * *
(4) Subject to the limitation imposed by R.S. 17:3100.7(B), the authority
shall guarantee, until the date of the execution of a contract with a program manager
as provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title, payment of the redemption value of an
education savings account in which the deposits and interest are invested in fixed
earnings.
* * *
G. The authority may enter into a contract with a program manager to
administer savings accounts and to invest the funds in such accounts as provided in
Chapter 22-C of this Title.
* * *
§3100.8. Louisiana Education and Tuition Savings Fund; use
* * *
I. The authority may enter into a contract with a program manager to
administer education savings accounts and to invest the funds in such accounts as
provided in Chapter 22-C of this Title.
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
J.(1) Beginning on the date of the execution of a contract between the
authority and a program manager, monies in education savings accounts as contained
in the Louisiana Tuition and Savings Fund may be administered and invested by the
program manager.
(2) On the date of the execution of a contract between the authority and a
program manager, all monies deposited in savings accounts as contained in this fund
shall be transferred to the program manager, except for contents of the Savings
Enhancement Fund, which shall continue to be subject to the provisions of R.S.
17:3129.4.
* * *
CHAPTER 22-C. ADMINISTRATION OF SAVINGS ACCOUNTS AND
INVESTMENT OF ACCOUNT FUNDS
§3100.21. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter:
(1) "ABLE account" means a special savings account as defined in R.S.
17:3082 for purposes of the ABLE account program as provided in Chapter 22 of
this Title.
(2) "Authority" means the Louisiana Tuition Trust Authority.
(3) "Program manager" means an entity with which the authority contracts
for the administration of savings accounts provided for in Chapters 22, 22-A, and 22-
B of this Title and the investment of account funds as provided in this Chapter.
(4) "Savings account" means ABLE, START, and START K12 savings
accounts provided for, respectively, in Chapters 22, 22-A, and 22-B of this Title.
(5) "START account" means an education savings account as defined in R.S.
17:3092 for purposes of the START Program as provided in Chapter 22-A of this
Title.
(6) "START K12 account" means an education savings account as defined
in R.S. 17:3100.2 for purposes of the START K12 program as provided in Chapter
22-B of this Title.
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
§3100.22. Legislative intent; administration and management of savings account
programs
A.(1) It is the intent of the legislature to provide for safe and efficient
administration of savings accounts and investment of savings account funds.
(2) Beginning on the date of the execution of a contract between the
authority and a program manager as provided in this Chapter, the provisions of this
Chapter shall govern the administration of savings accounts and the investment of
savings account funds.
B.(1) The provisions of this Chapter shall comply with the provisions of
Sections 529 and 529A of the Internal Revenue Code. Any provision of this Chapter
determined to be in conflict with any requirement of the code as applicable to a
qualified tuition program as defined in Section 529 of the federal Internal Revenue
Code, as amended, or a qualified ABLE program as defined in Section 529A of the
federal Internal Revenue Code, as amended, shall be superseded by such code
provision to the extent necessary to assure that the program continues to meet the
code's definition of each of these programs, as applicable.
(2) Any requirement of this Chapter determined to be more restrictive than
the requirements of the federal Internal Revenue Code as applicable to such a tuition
program or ABLE program may be modified to conform with code requirements by
the authority by rule promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act.
C. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to limit the powers and duties
of the authority as provided in Chapters 22, 22-A, and 22-B of this Title, including
but not limited to the provisions of R.S. 17:3085, 3093, and 3100.3.
§3100.23. The Louisiana Tuition Trust Authority; powers relative to the
administration of the savings account programs
A. The authority shall continue to exercise the powers and duties conferred
upon it pursuant to Chapters 22, 22-A, and 22-B of this Title. The authority may
enter into a contract with a program manager to administer savings accounts and to
invest the funds in such accounts. The program manager shall be required under the
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
contract to provide qualifying savings account owners with access to enrollment in
an operating qualified tuition program as defined in Section 529 of the federal
Internal Revenue Code, as amended, or a qualified ABLE program as defined in
Section 529A of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as amended.
B. On the date of the execution of a contract between the authority and a
program manager:
(1) All savings accounts shall be transferred to the program manager for
account administration and investment of account funds.
(2) All deposited monies for savings accounts contained in the Tuition and
Savings Fund as provided in R.S. 17:3129.4 shall be transferred to the program
manager. The monies in the Savings Enhancement Fund shall remain in the state
treasury, and the treasurer shall continue to administer the Savings Enhancement
Fund in accordance with R.S. 17:3129.4 for the purposes provided in Chapters 22-A
and 22-B of this Title.
C. Beginning on the date of the execution of the contract with the program
manager, monies to be deposited in savings accounts shall be sent directly to the
program manager, except for cash deposits. The Board of Regents shall provide for
the receipt of cash deposits, their placement in a subaccount created for this purpose,
and their transmittal to the program manager along with any instructions received
from the account owner regarding investment selections.
§3100.24. Program manager; responsibilities
The program manager shall, at a minimum, do the following:
(1) Offer account owners a selection of investment options that shall include
an option equivalent to fixed earnings as defined in R.S. 17:3082, 3092, and 3100.2
that ensures the security of the principal and interest thereon and may include options
for variable earnings as defined in R.S. 17:3082, 3092, and 3100.2.
(2) Administer accounts according to valid instructions from account
owners.
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
(3) Collect and report data to the legislative auditor for purposes of audits.
(4) Provide annual account owner statements.
(5) Provide tax documents to each account owner relative to his account,
including information on deposits for the previous calendar year and deposit totals
over time.
(6) Provide annual reporting of disbursements for expenses that do not meet
the definition of qualified disability expenses as defined in R.S. 17:3082, qualified
higher education expenses as defined in R.S. 17:3092, or qualified education
expenses as defined in R.S. 17:3100.2 to the Department of Revenue and the Internal
Revenue Service.
(7) Provide rollover reporting to the authority.
(8) Provide quarterly reporting to the authority on the total number of
accounts and total assets by account type, including the number of new accounts and
the number of closed accounts.
(9) Provide annual reporting to the authority of investment performance by
investment type.
(10) Enter into agreements with account owners' employers for payroll
deduction deposits.
(11) Provide annual accounting to START account owners providing their
progress in saving towards five years' of qualified higher education expenses as
provided in R.S. 17:3095(E).
(12) Determine the fully funded account amount for START accounts as
provided in 17:3096(D).
§3100.25. Notification of contract; presiding officers of the legislature and the state
treasurer
The authority shall submit written notification to the speaker of the House of
Representatives, the president of the Senate, and the state treasurer of the execution
of a contract with a program manager within twenty-four hours following such
execution.
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
§3100.26. Implementation; coordination between Louisiana Tuition Trust Authority
and state treasurer
If the authority contracts with a program manager as authorized by this
Chapter, the authority and the state treasurer shall coordinate on the transfer of
information necessary for the migration of savings accounts and the investment of
account funds to the program manager and for the implementation of all other
provisions of this Chapter.
* * *
§3129.4. Louisiana Education Tuition and Savings Plan and Fund
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and as provided in
Chapter 22-C of this Title:
(1) Beginning on the date of the execution of a contract between the
authority and a program manager, monies in savings accounts as contained in the
Tuition and Savings Fund may be administered and invested by the program
manager.
(2) On the date of the execution of a contract between the authority and a
program manager, all monies deposited in savings accounts as contained in the
Tuition and Savings Fund shall be transferred to the program manager, except for the
contents of the Savings Enhancement Fund, which shall continue to be subject to the
provisions of this Section.
Section 2.(A) The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to redesignate the
provisions of R.S. 17:3100.21 through 3100.26, as contained in Chapter 22-C of Title 17 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, as R.S. 17:3101
through 3106.
(B) The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to redesignate the
provisions of R.S. 17:3101 through 3109, as contained in Chapter 23 of Title 17 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, as R.S. 17:3111 through 3119.
Page 12 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 749 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 13 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.